FST/tuv/morph.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %+N
        %+SG %+PL
        %+PSS1S
        %+PSS2S
        %+PSS3S/PSS3P
        %+PSS1P
        %+PSS2P
        %+NOM %+GEN %+ACC %+DAT %+LOC %+ABL %+ALL

LEXICON Root
аажы    noun;
аажылал noun;
оор     noun;
кожаң   noun;
колбаса noun;
психиатр noun;  

LEXICON noun
%+N     noun_number;

LEXICON noun_number
%+SG    noun_posessive;
%+PL    noun_posessive;

LEXICON noun_posessive
        noun_case;
%+PSS1S noun_case;
%+PSS2S noun_case;
%+PSS3S/PSS3P noun_case;
%+PSS1P noun_case;
%+PSS2P noun_case;

LEXICON noun_case
%+NOM   #;
%+GEN   #;
%+ACC   #;
%+DAT   #;
%+LOC   #;
%+ABL   #;
%+ALL   #;
